tests/future.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../crh.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../crh.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "some future forms with E:y":
    ol<v><iv><neg><fut2><p3><sg> : olmaycaq
    toqtat<v><tv><neg><fut2><p3><pl> : toqtatmaycaqlar
    başla<v><tv><fut2><p3><sg> : başlaycaq
    belgile<v><tv><fut2><p3><sg> : belgileycek
